Florida, session 2026, HB555.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 163.212, Florida Statutes, is created
and incorporated into part I of chapter 163, Florida Statutes,
to read:
163.212 Authorized local licensing of occupations.—In
accordance with s. 163.211(2)(b), a county or municipality may,
within its jurisdiction, license a home caregiver.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb555-00